en: sundried tomato hummus
sv: hummus med soltorkad tomat, hummus soltorkad tomat

en: falafel
xx: falafel
bg: фалафел
de: Falafel
pl: falafel, falafla, falafle, falafele

en: fruit extract
bg: плодов екстракт, екстракт от плодове
da: frugtekstrakt
de: Fruchtextrakt, Frucht-Extrakt
es: extracto de frutas, extracto de fruta
fi: hedelmäuute
fr: extrait de fruit
it: Estratto di frutta, estratti di frutta
nb: fruktekstrakt
nl: vruchtenextract
nn: fruktekstrakt
pl: ekstrakt z owoców
pt: extrato de fruto, extrato de fruta, extrato de frutos, extrato de frutas, extracto de fruto, extracto de fruta, extracto de frutos, extracto de frutas
sv: fruktextrakt

en: apple extract, apple essence
bg: екстракт от ябълка, ябълков екстракт
de: Apfelextrakt
es: extracto de manzana
fi: omenauute, omenatiiviste, makeuttava omenauute
fr: extrait de pomme, concentré de pomme
hr: ekstrakt jabuke
it: estratto di mele, estratto di mela
nl: appelextract
pt: extrato de maçã, extracto de maçã
sv: äppelkoncentrat, äppelextrakt, sötande äppelextrakt

en: orange extract
bg: екстракт от портокал, портокалов екстракт
de: Orangenextrakt
es: Extracto de naranja
fi: appelsiiniuute
fr: extrait d'orange
hr: orange extract
it: estratto di arancia
nl: sinaasappelextracten
pl: ekstrakt z pomarańczy, ekstrakty z pomarańczy
pt: extrato de laranja, extracto de laranja

en: aromatic caramel
de: aromatisches Karamell
es: caramelo aromático
fr: caramel aromatique
hr: aromatična karamela
it: caramello aromatico
nl: aromatische karamel, aromatiserende karamel
pt: caramelo aromático

en: natural colorings
sv: naturligt färgande livsmedel

en: stuffed tomatoes
bg: пълнени домати
de: gefüllte Tomaten
fr: tomates farcies, tomate farcie
hr: punjene rajčice
it: pomodori ripieni
nl: gevulde tomaat, gevulde tomaten

en: stuffed poblano peppers
it: peperoni poblano ripieni

en: alfalfa
de: Luzerne
es: alfalfa
fr: luzerne
hr: lucerna
it: erba medica
ja: アルファルファ
pl: lucerna

en: poblano chili
es: chile poblano
fr: piment poblano
hr: poblano čili
it: pepe Poblano

en: xylose
xx: xylose
ja: キシロース

en: tonka bean
de: Tonkabohne, Tonkabohnen
es: haba tonka
fr: fève de tonka, fèves de tonka, fève tonka, fèves tonka
hr: tonka grah
it: fava de tonka, fave di tonka
nl: tonkaboon
pt: fava tonka, fava de cumaru

en: creaming powder, creamer
it: crema in polvere
ja: クリーミングパウダー

en: donkey
fr: âne
it: asino
nl: ezel

en: donkey meat
fr: viande d'âne
it: carne d'asino
nl: ezelvlees

en: kangaroo
fr: kangourou
it: canguro
nl: kangaroo

en: kangaroo meat
fr: viande de kangourou
it: carne di canguro
nl: kangaroovlees

en: bull
fr: taureau
it: toro
nl: stier

en: bull meat
fr: viande de taureau
it: carne di toro
nl: stierenvlees